Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXIII. HEALTH EDUCATION]

[§321-301] Bilingual health education aide
program; establishment. There is established in the department of health a
bilingual health education aide program. Under the program, bilingual health
education aides shall assist in the provision of health education and public
health services to non-English and limited English speaking persons living in
the State. The department, subject to chapter 76, shall employ bilingual
health education aides and other necessary personnel for the program. [L 1986,
c 307, §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Cross References

Bilingual mental health services, see §334-12.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next